Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 4. Membership in Retirement System.
§ 51.1-126.3.
Employees of the University of Virginia Medical Center.

The University of Virginia Medical Center, hereafter referred to as the Medical Center, may establish one or more retirement plans covering in whole or in part its employees. The Medical Center is authorized to make contributions for the benefit of its employees who are covered by any plan established pursuant to this section. Any such alternative retirement plans for Medical Center employees shall not become effective until such time as the Board of Visitors of the University of Virginia may determine. Except as provided herein, all employees of the Medical Center who are employed by the Medical Center on or after July 1, 2000, shall be participants in a Medical Center retirement plan established pursuant to this section, with a contribution by the Medical Center at a rate to be determined by the University of Virginia Board of Visitors. However, an employee hired by the Medical Center on or after July 1, 2003, who, as of the first day of such employment, is a current member of the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan established by this chapter shall elect to either: (i) continue to participate in such defined benefit retirement plan or (ii) choose the plan provided by the Medical Center with a contribution by the Medical Center at a rate to be determined by the University of Virginia Board of Visitors. Such election shall be exercised not later than 60 days from the time of the employee’s entry into the performance of his duties for the Medical Center, and the election shall be irrevocable. During such 60-day period, to the time of such election, such employee shall participate in the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan established by this chapter. If such election is not made within the time period provided in this subsection, such employee shall be deemed to have elected to participate in the retirement plan established by the Medical Center.

With respect to any employee of the Medical Center who elects to continue to participate in the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan, the Medical Center shall collect and pay all employee and employer contributions due to the Virginia Retirement System for retirement and group life insurance in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of this title for such employees. For Medical Center employees who elect or who are required pursuant to subsection A to become members of the retirement program established by the Medical Center, the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized plan shall transfer to the retirement plan established by the Medical Center assets equal to the actuarially determined present value of the accrued basic benefit as of the transfer date. For purposes hereof, the basic benefit shall be the benefit accrued under the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan, based on creditable service and average final compensation, as defined in §

51.1-124.3

and determined as of the transfer date. The actuarial present value shall be determined on the same basis, using the same actuarial factors and assumptions used in determining the funding needs of the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan, so that the transfer of assets to the retirement plan established by the Medical Center will have no effect on the funded status and financial stability of the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan.

No employee of the Medical Center who is an active member of any plan established under this section shall also be an active member of the retirement system established by this chapter or a beneficiary of such other plan other than as a contingent annuitant.

The University of Virginia Board of Visitors shall adopt guidelines for the implementation of the provisions of this section, including guidelines for the administration of any retirement plan established pursuant to this section. The Board shall have no duties and responsibilities with respect to such plan. The guidelines adopted by the Board of Visitors shall be filed with the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

History.

1996, cc. 933, 995; 2000, c. 723; 2003, c. 369.

The number of this section was assigned by the Code Commission,

the number in the 1996 acts having been §

51.1-126.2

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 933 and 995, cl. 2 provides: “[t]hat any alternative retirement plan for health care provider employees of the University of Virginia Medical Center which was in effect prior to July 1, 1996, pursuant to §

51.1-126.1

of the Code of Virginia, shall remain in effect until the alternative retirement plan for such employees established pursuant to §

51.1-126.2

[reassigned as §

51.1-126.3

] of the Code of Virginia is implemented.”

Acts 2003, c. 369, cl. 2 provides: “That, except as provided in this enactment, prior to December 31, 2003, no institution of higher education may establish and maintain an optional retirement plan covering its employees who are engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties. On or before November 1, 2003, and prior to granting approval to any institution of higher education to establish and maintain such optional retirement plan, the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System shall prepare and release a plan to the chairmen of the Senate Finance Committee and House Appropriations Committee establishing criteria and guidelines that shall be applied by the Board in determining whether to grant approval to an institution of higher education to establish and maintain such optional retirement plan. No institution of higher education shall establish and maintain such optional retirement plan unless it has been granted approval by the Board, in writing, in accordance with such criteria and guidelines. The provisions of this enactment shall not be applicable to any institution of higher education that (i) prior to July 1, 2003, established an optional retirement plan for its employees who are engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties, and (ii) is maintaining such plan as of June 30, 2003.”

Acts 2003, c. 369, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of subsection C of §

51.1-126

requiring certain employees engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties at an institution of higher education to participate in an optional retirement plan established by such institution shall apply to both (i) any such employee who elected prior to July 1, 2003, to participate in an optional retirement plan pursuant to §

51.1-126

and who is covered by an optional retirement plan at the time such institution establishes its own optional retirement plan and (ii) any such employee who on or after July 1, 2003, elected to participate in an optional retirement plan maintained by the Board.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by c. 723, in subsection A, rewrote the first paragraph, and added the second paragraph; deleted former subsection C, which read: “The contribution by the Medical Center to any retirement plan established on behalf of employees of the Medical Center as provided in subsection A shall be eight percent of creditable compensation”; redesignated former subsection D as present subsection C, and added the first sentence, and deleted “under subsection A” following “Board of Visitors” in the second sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 369 rewrote present subsection A; redesignated the second paragraph of subsection A as present subsection B; in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “of the Medical Center,” substituted “continue to participate in” for “remain a member of,” substituted “defined benefit retirement plan” for “or other such authorized retirement plan,” inserted “due” and deleted “or other such authorized retirement plan” following “Retirement System”; in the second sentence of subsection B, substituted “Medical Center employees who elect or who are required pursuant to subsection A” for “current and new Medical Center employees who are current members of the retirement system established by this chapter, including any persons covered under a retirement plan established pursuant to §

51.1-126

”; redesignated former subsections B and C as present subsections C and D; and in subsection D, inserted “including guidelines for the administration of any retirement plan established pursuant to this section. The Board shall have no duties and responsibilities with respect to such plan.”

§ 51.1-126.4.
Employees of the Virginia Port Authority.

The Virginia Port Authority, hereinafter referred to as the Authority, may establish one or more retirement plans covering in whole or in part its employees. The Authority is authorized to make contributions for the benefit of its employees who elect to participate in such plan or arrangement rather than in any other retirement system established by this chapter. Any such alternative retirement plan shall become effective at such time as determined by the Authority. The Authority shall notify the Virginia Retirement System of the establishment of such plan no later than ninety days prior to the effective date. Any present employee of the Authority may make an irrevocable election to participate in the retirement plan established by this chapter or any plan provided by the Authority. Such election shall be made no later than 180 days after the effective date of the plan provided for in this section on forms supplied by the Virginia Retirement System. Any employee hired on or after the effective date of the plan provided for in this section shall become a participant in that plan, subject to the eligibility criteria of that plan.

No employee of the Authority who is an active member of a plan established under this section shall also be an active member of the retirement system established by this chapter or a beneficiary of such other plan other than as a contingent annuitant.

The Authority shall develop policies and procedures for the administration of any retirement plan it establishes under this section. A copy of such policies and procedures shall be filed with the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

Pursuant to §

62.1-129.1

, employees of the Authority shall be eligible to continue their participation in the Virginia Retirement System or may participate in an alternative retirement plan offered pursuant to this section.

History.

1997, c. 232; 2015, c. 660.

Cross references.

As to authorization for, and administration of, a trust for postemployment benefits for employees of the Port Authority, see §

62.1-129.2

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 660 deleted subsection C, which read “The contribution by the Authority to any other retirement plan established on behalf of its employees as provided in subsection A shall be the contribution by the Commonwealth which would be required if the employee were a member of the retirement system established by this chapter or eight percent of creditable compensation, whichever is less.”; and redesignated former subsections D and E as subsections C and D.

§ 51.1-126.5.
Defined contribution plan for eligible members.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:“Eligible member” means a member who holds an eligible position.“Eligible position” means a position designated in subdivision 3, 4, or 20 of §

2.2-2905

or an officer or employee appointed by the Attorney General or Lieutenant Governor to a position designated as a deputy, counsel or director position.“Participating member” means an eligible member who elects to participate in the plan.“Plan” means the defined contribution plan established pursuant to this section.

The Board shall establish a plan covering any eligible member who elects to participate in the plan. The plan shall be in lieu of the service retirement allowance provided by the retirement system under §

51.1-155

. Participating members shall be deemed to be members of the retirement system to the extent consistent with the provisions of this section.

Any person who becomes an eligible member after July 1, 1998, shall elect upon accepting an eligible position to participate in either (i) the retirement system or (ii) the plan. Such election shall be made in accordance with guidelines established by the Virginia Retirement System.

Upon ceasing to be employed in an eligible position but continuing to be an employee of the Commonwealth, a participating member may elect to:

Maintain the accrued contributions and earnings in his defined contribution account; or

Use the accrued contributions and earnings in his defined contribution account to purchase service credit in the retirement system as provided in subsection F.

After termination of employment, a participating member may withdraw the accrued contributions and earnings from his defined contribution account, subject to applicable state and federal law and regulation.

Upon an election under subsection D by a participating member who has ceased to be employed in an eligible position, the accrued contributions and earnings in such electing person’s defined contribution account shall be used to purchase service credit in the retirement system at a rate to be established by the Board. Such rate shall cover the actuarial cost of providing the creditable service. If the account is less than the actuarial cost of the total time worked in the eligible position, the employee may use his own funds to purchase the remaining time. In no event shall the amount of service credit purchased in the retirement system exceed the time that was served in an eligible position while participating in the plan. Any amount of accrued contributions and earnings in such electing person’s defined contribution account in excess of the amount required to purchase service credit in the retirement system for the time served in an eligible position while participating in the plan shall be forfeited to the Virginia Retirement System.

The contribution by the Commonwealth to a participating member’s defined contribution account shall be determined by the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System in consultation with its actuary. Contributions to the defined contribution account and all earnings thereon shall be credited to an account to be maintained for each participating member. Contributions by the Commonwealth to a participating member’s defined contribution account shall be in lieu of contributions to the retirement system required pursuant to §

51.1-145

.

If a member of the optional retirement plan maintained under this section is at any time in service as an employee in a position covered for retirement purposes under the provisions of this chapter, Chapter 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or Chapter 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) of this title, his benefit payments under the optional retirement plan maintained under this section shall be suspended while so employed; provided, however, reemployment in such position shall have no effect on the payment under the optional retirement plan maintained under this section if the benefits are being paid in an annuity form under a lifetime annuity contract purchased with the member’s account balance.

Effective January 1, 2014, any reference to “retirement system” in this section shall mean the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

. The Virginia Retirement System shall (i) develop policies and procedures for the administration of the plan and (ii) provide a program of education and support for participating members.

History.

1998, c. 661; 1999, c. 111; 2001, c. 691; 2002, c. 668; 2004, c. 206; 2006, c. 639; 2012, cc. 701, 823.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 661, cl. 2 provides: “That any participating member serving in an eligible position on the effective date of this act [July 1, 1998] shall have the option of having all employee contributions, employer contributions, and interest that was credited to his retirement account after January 17, 1998, refunded to his employer and deposited in the participating member’s defined contribution account.”

Acts 2001, c. 691, cl. 2, provides: “Any participating member in the defined contribution plan (plan) as defined in subsection A of §

51.1-126.5

, who is an employee in service in an eligible position immediately before and after the effective date of this act, shall have ninety days beginning July 1, 2001, in which to make a one-time, irrevocable election to transfer from the plan to the retirement system. A participating member who makes such an election (i) shall have all accrued contributions and earnings in his plan used for the purchase of service credit in the retirement system pursuant to subsection F of §

51.1-126.5

, and (ii) shall thereafter be ineligible to participate in the plan.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 1999 amendment

inserted “or Lieutenant Governor” in the paragraph defining “Eligible position”; in subsection D, added “After ten years of service in an eligible position, or within ninety days after ceasing to be employed in an eligible position” at the beginning of the first sentence, and substituted “G” for “F” at the end of the second sentence; deleted “After ten years of service in an eligible position, or within ninety days after ceasing to be employed in an eligible position” at the beginning of subsection E; added “or” at the end of subdivision 1; substituted “G” for “F; or” at the end of subdivision 2; redesignated former subdivision 3 as subsection F, and added “Within ninety days after termination of employment, a participating member may” at the beginning of subsection F; redesignated former subsections F, G and H as G, H and I; in subsection G, in the first sentence, deleted “(i)” preceding “under subsection D,” inserted “(i)” following “participating employee” and deleted “under subdivision E 2 by a participating employee” following clause (ii).

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 691 deleted the former first sentence in subsection C, which formerly read: “Any person who is an eligible member on July 1, 1998, shall elect, by August 1, 1998, to participate in either (i) the retirement system or (ii) the plan”; deleted former subsection D, which formerly read: “After ten years of service in an eligible position, or within ninety days after ceasing to be employed in an eligible position, a participating member may make a one-time, irrevocable election to transfer to the retirement system. Upon making such election, any accrued contributions and earnings in his defined contribution account shall be used to purchase service credit in the retirement system as provided in subsection G. A participating member who elects to transfer from the plan to the retirement system while serving in an eligible position shall thereafter be ineligible to participate in the plan”; redesignated former subsections E through I as present subsections D through H; rewrote introductory language in present subsection D which formerly read: “A participating member who has not previously elected to transfer to the retirement system pursuant to subsection D shall elect to”; substituted “subsection F” for “subsection G” in subdivision D 2; substituted “member who has ceased” for “employee (i) transferring to the retirement system or (ii) ceasing” in subsection F; and substituted “determined by the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System in consultation with its actuary” for “10.4 percent of creditable compensation” in subsection G.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 668 deleted “Within ninety days” at the beginning of subsection E.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 206 substituted “20” for “21” in the paragraph defining “Eligible position” in subsection A; and inserted the third sentence in subsection F.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 639 added subsection H and redesignated former subsection H as subsection I.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are identical, and added the present first sentence of subsection I.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Administrative fees may not be charged to participants in optional retirement plan for political appointees. —

The Virginia Retirement System has no authority to charge the participants of the optional retirement plan for political appointees an administrative fee. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. W. Forrest Matthews, Jr., Director, Virginia Retirement System, 01-123 (4/29/02).

§ 51.1-126.6.
Certain employees of public school divisions.

The Board shall establish a defined contribution plan covering any eligible employee serving in a position designated in § 22.1-60 who elects to participate in the plan.

Any school board established pursuant to Article VIII, Section 7 of the Constitution of Virginia and Chapter 5 (§ 22.1-28 et seq.) of Title 22.1 is hereby authorized to make contributions to the optional retirement plan established by the Virginia Retirement System pursuant to this section for the benefit of its eligible employees who elect to participate in such a plan. Any eligible employee of such school board hired on or after the effective date of the plan shall make an irrevocable election to participate in either (i) the retirement system established by this chapter or (ii) the optional retirement plan established by the Virginia Retirement System pursuant to this section. Such election shall be made in accordance with the guidelines established by the Virginia Retirement System.

No employee of any school board who is an active member of the retirement plan established under this section shall also be an active member in the Virginia Retirement System or beneficiary thereof other than as a contingent annuitant. Such eligible employee may, however, be covered under any insurance plan established by the Board under this title for which he would have been otherwise eligible.

The contribution by the school board to such employee’s defined contribution account shall be determined by the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System in consultation with its actuary. Contributions to the defined contribution account and all earnings thereon shall be credited to an account to be maintained for each eligible employee who elects to participate. Contributions by the school board to an electing employee’s defined contribution account shall be in lieu of contributions to the retirement system required pursuant to §

51.1-145

. In addition, any person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, shall, pursuant to procedures established by the Board, pay member contributions on a salary reduction basis in accordance with § 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, in an amount equal to five percent of his creditable compensation, to the retirement plan established under this section. Each employee making such member contribution shall be deemed to consent and agree to any salary reduction for purposes of the member contribution. Such member contributions shall be in addition to all contributions by the school board to such employee’s defined contribution account.

If a member of the optional retirement plan maintained under this section is at any time in service as an employee in a position covered for retirement purposes under the provisions of this chapter, Chapter 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or Chapter 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) of this title, his benefit payments under the optional retirement plan maintained under this section shall be suspended while so employed; provided, however, reemployment in such position shall have no effect on the payment under the optional retirement plan maintained under this section if the benefits are being paid in an annuity form under a lifetime annuity contract purchased with the member’s account balance.

Effective January 1, 2014, any reference to “retirement system” or “Virginia Retirement System” in this section, as the context requires, shall mean the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

. The Virginia Retirement System shall develop policies and procedures for the administration of such plan in accordance with existing and future federal and state policies, regulations, and statutes governing the administration of such plans.

History.

1998, c. 822; 2000, c. 345; 2001, c. 691; 2002, c. 668; 2006, c. 639; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2013, c. 463.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1998 act having been

51.1-126.5

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 345, cl. 2 provides: “That any school board which had elected to provide an alternative retirement plan as provided in §

51.1-126.6

prior to the effective date of this act, may request that such retirement plan be governed by the provisions of this act. Such election shall be made prior to January 1, 2001.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 345, in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “may offer” for “may establish and administer,” and in the last sentence, deleted “ninety days after the effective date of this legislation for those employees employed on that date and not later than” following “not later than,” and deleted “hired after such effective date” following “for employees”; substituted “Virginia Retirement System in consultation with its actuary” for “school board” in subsection C; and substituted “Virginia Retirement System” for “school board establishing a retirement plan as provided for in this section” in subsection D.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 691 added present subsection A; redesignated former subsections A through D as present subsections B through E; in subsection B, deleted “may offer a retirement plan for the benefit of eligible members serving in a position designated in § 22.1-60 and” following “Title 22.1,” inserted “to the optional retirement plan established by the Virginia Retirement System pursuant to this section,” substituted “Any eligible employee of such school board hired on or after the effective date of the plan” for “rather than in the retirement plan established by this chapter. Any present or future eligible employee of such school board,” inserted “(i),” and “(ii),” substituted “optional retirement plan established by the Virginia Retirement System pursuant to this section. Such election shall be made,” for “provided by the school board employing him,” deleted “for making such election as” following “the guidelines,” and substituted “thirty days” for “ninety days”; and in subsection D, substituted “defined contribution account” for “retirement plan,” inserted “Board of Trustees of the,” and added the second and third sentences.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 668 deleted the last sentence of subsection B which formerly read: “The election provided for herein shall be exercised not later than thirty days from the date performance of duties begins for employees.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 639 added subsection E and redesignated former subsection E as subsection F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are identical, and added the present first sentence of subsection F.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463 added the fourth through last sentences in subsection D.

§ 51.1-126.7.
Employees of the Virginia Outdoors Foundation.

The Virginia Outdoors Foundation, hereinafter referred to as the Foundation, may establish a retirement plan covering in whole or in part its employees. The Foundation is authorized to make contributions for the benefit of its employees who elect to participate in such plan or arrangement rather than in any other retirement system established by this chapter. Any such alternative retirement plan shall become effective at such times as determined by the Foundation. The Foundation shall notify the Virginia Retirement System of the establishment of such plan no later than ninety days prior to the effective date. Any present employee of the Foundation may make an irrevocable election to participate in the retirement plan established by this chapter or any plan provided by the Foundation. Such election shall be made no later than 180 days after the effective date of the plan provided for in this section on forms supplied by the Virginia Retirement System. Any employee hired on or after the effective date of the plan provided for in this section shall become a participant in that plan, subject to the eligibility criteria of that plan.

No employee of the Foundation who is an active member of a plan established under this section shall also be an active member of the retirement system established by this chapter or a beneficiary of such other plan other than as a contingent annuitant.

Upon an election by an employee of the Foundation to participate in the retirement plan established by the Foundation, the employee may also elect to transfer his accumulated contribution account, as reduced by the amount of any retirement allowance previously received by him under any of the provisions of this chapter or the abolished system, directly to the retirement plan established by the Foundation as a credit to his account in such plan. This election shall only be permitted if the plan established by the Foundation is a qualified plan under Section 401 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code. If a transfer is elected, no portion of the transferred amount shall be available to the member until benefits under the retirement plan established by the Foundation are otherwise available for distribution. The transfer of the accumulated contributions to such retirement plan shall be treated as a withdrawal of the member’s accumulated contributions for purposes of §

51.1-128

.

The Foundation shall continue to pay the required contributions to the Virginia Retirement System for employees who do not elect to participate in the retirement plan established by the Foundation pursuant to this section.

History.

2001, c. 698.

§ 51.1-126.8.
Maximum contributions to optional plans; coordination of limits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the annual additions to the optional retirement plans described in Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of this title shall be reduced, if necessary, to the extent required by § 415 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted by the Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to § 415 (d) of the Internal Revenue Code. If an employee participating in an optional retirement plan is also a participant in another defined contribution plan qualified under §§ 401 (a) or 403 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code and sponsored or maintained by an employer participating in such optional retirement plan, the employer shall apply the combined limit test required by § 415 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code. Whenever a reduction in annual additions is required to comply with the limitations of § 415 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the annual additions under such employer’s other plan or plans will be reduced before contributions under the optional retirement plan.

Any vendor for an optional retirement plan that is a defined contribution plan established by Article 4 of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1 shall (i) request and maintain the records needed, (ii) perform the testing services required to assure compliance with the limitation described in § 415 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code, including testing required where the employer maintains or sponsors another defined contribution plan that must be tested together with the optional retirement plan, and (iii) advise the employer of any contribution that exceeds the applicable limitation. If there is no vendor for these services, the employer shall (a) request and maintain the records needed, (b) perform the testing services required to assure compliance with the limitation described in § 415 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code, including testing required where the employer maintains or sponsors another defined contribution plan that must be tested together with the optional retirement plan, and (c) reduce any contribution that exceeds the applicable limitation.

History.

2002, c. 435.

§ 51.1-127.
Federal Employees’ Retirement System.

The Virginia Cooperative Extension Service is hereby authorized to make contributions into the Federal Employees’ Retirement System for the benefit of its employees who hold federal governmental appointments and who elect to participate in the system.
No employee who is an active member of the Federal Employees’ Retirement System shall also be an active member or beneficiary other than a contingent annuitant of the retirement system or any retirement plan authorized by this chapter or administered by the Board.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.28; 1978, c. 841; 1982, c. 467; 1987, c. 215; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-128.
Cessation of membership.

Membership in the retirement system shall cease (i) upon the withdrawal of the member’s accumulated contributions except as provided in subsection C of §

51.1-153

, (ii) upon retirement, (iii) upon death, or (iv) as provided by Board policy for dormant accounts.

An employee shall lose all rights to any benefits under this chapter arising from service rendered prior to the date of cessation of membership.

History.

1952, c. 157, §§ 51-111.29, 51-111.43; 1954, c. 643; 1960, c. 604; 1966, c. 174; 1978, c. 841; 1984, c. 430; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 811.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1984, c. 430, cl. 3 provides that the provisions of this section shall be construed to be applicable to persons who have retired prior to July 1, 1984, as well as those who will retire subsequent to that date.

§ 51.1-129.
Limitation on membership.

No provision of any other statute which provides that the Commonwealth shall pay the entire or a portion of the cost of retirement benefits for employees, their surviving spouses, or other dependents shall apply to members or beneficiaries of the retirement system, or to their surviving spouses, or other dependents.
This provision shall not apply to any benefits extended under any agreement between the Commonwealth and the federal government, or any agency thereof, or any benefits extended under the Government Employees Deferred Compensation Plan Act (§

51.1-600

et seq.).

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.30; 1976, c. 654; 1990, c. 832.